Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB513.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 46 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART IIILEGISLATIONChapter21. Racial Impact Statements CHAPTER 21RACIAL IMPACT STATEMENTSSec.2101. Scope of chapter.2102. Definitions.2103. Racial impact statements.§ 2101. Scope of chapter. 123456789101112131415161718 This chapter relates to racial impact statements.§ 2102. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commission." The Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing.§ 2103. Racial impact statements. (a) Authorized.-- Upon request of a member of either house of the General Assembly, the commission shall complete a racial impact statement for any bill, joint resolution, freestanding act or amendment that would create a new criminal offense, change an existing offense in 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses), create a new penalty or provision related to sentencing or change an existing law in 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 97 (relating to sentencing) to determine the impact, if any, the proposed legislation may have on the racial and ethnic composition of the criminal offender population or juvenile court system. The racial impact statement shall be impartial, simple and understandable.(b) Effect of request.--(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d)(1), no bill, joint resolution or freestanding act for which a racial impact statement has been requested under subsection (a) may be given second consideration by the house of the General Assembly whose member made the request until such time as the commission has attached the racial impact statement.(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d)(2), neither an amendment for which a racial impact statement has been requested under subsection (a), nor the legislation to 20250SB0513PN0476 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 which the amendment is offered, shall be considered by the house of the General Assembly whose member made the request until such time as the commission has attached the racial impact statement.(c) Contents.--For racial and ethnic groups for which data are available, the racial impact statement shall include the following:(1) An estimate of how the legislation would change the racial and ethnic composition of the criminal offender population and juvenile court system.(2) A statement of the methodologies and assumptions used in preparing the estimate.(3) If the racial impact statement addresses the effect of the legislation on the criminal offender population and juvenile court system, an estimate of the racial and ethnic composition of the crime victims who may be affected by the legislation.(d) Effect of failure to attach.-- (1) If the commission fails to attach a racial impact statement within 10 days after a request for a statement has been submitted to the commission, the proposed legislation may be considered in the same manner as if the racial impact statement had been attached to the legislation.(2) If the commission fails to attach a racial impact statement to an amendment within 10 days after a request for a statement has been submitted to the commission, the amendment and underlying legislation may be considered in the same manner as if the racial impact statement had been attached to the amendment.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0513PN0476 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930